Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6171YH (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2482 Section 1. Section 11.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 2. a. A governmental subdivision contracting with certified 3 public accountants shall do so in a reasonable manner on the 4 basis of competence and qualification for the services required 5 and for a fair and reasonable price utilizing procedures which 6 include a written request for proposals. 7 b. Income received by a certified public accountant 8 performing an audit or examination of a governmental 9 subdivision pursuant to this section shall be exempt from 10 taxation under section 422.7 or 422.33, as applicable. 11 Sec. 2. Section 422.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 46. Subtract, to the extent included, 14 income received by a certified public accountant performing an 15 audit or examination of a governmental subdivision pursuant to 16 section 11.6. 17 Sec. 3. Section 422.35, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. Subtract, to the extent included, 20 income received by a certified public accountant performing an 21 audit or examination of a governmental subdivision pursuant to 22 section 11.6. 23 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 24 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 25 or after that date. 26